Alabama, session 2026rs, HB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) HEALTH CARE PROVIDER. A physician licensed by the
Medical Licensure Commission pursuant to Article 8, Chapter 24
of Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975; a physician assistant
licensed by the State Board of Medical Examiners pursuant to
Article 7, Chapter 24 of Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975; or a
certified registered nurse practitioner licensed and certified
by the Board of Nursing pursuant to Article 5, Chapter 21 of
Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) STANDING ORDER. A prescription order that is not
patient specific.
(b) A pharmacist may dispense Ivermectin without a
prescription to an individual who is 19 years of age or older,
or to an unemancipated individual under 19 years of age upon
written consent of the individual's parent or legal guardian,
pursuant to a standing order that is signed by a health care
provider.
Page 2

provider.
HB146 INTRODUCED
(c) The standing order shall include all of the
following:
(1) A risk assessment protocol for use by the
pharmacist to screen an individual who requests Ivermectin and
which includes a plan for treating adverse events.
(2) A standardized information sheet that provides the
following information for the individual who is dispensed
Ivermectin:
a. Indications and contraindications for the use of
Ivermectin.
b. Instructions for using Ivermectin.
c. A statement on the importance of follow-up care and
health care referral information.
(3) A form for the pharmacist to record the completion
of the risk assessment protocol and the dosage dispensed to
the individual.
(d) No health care provider who signs a standing order,
and no pharmacist who dispenses Ivermectin pursuant to a
standing order, shall participate in any program or accept
anything of value that induces the health care provider or
pharmacist to affirmatively commend or endorse the use of
Ivermectin to an individual or the public.
(e)(1) The governing licensing board shall not take
disciplinary action against a health care provider who signs a
standing order for Ivermectin that is based upon a
pharmacist's dispensing of Ivermectin pursuant to that
standing order.
(2) The State Board of Pharmacy shall not take
Page 3

(2) The State Board of Pharmacy shall not take
HB146 INTRODUCED
disciplinary action against a pharmacist based upon any of the
following:
a. The pharmacist's failure in good faith to correctly
interpret and follow the standing order upon dispensing
Ivermectin.
b. A defect in the standing order upon which the
pharmacist relies when dispensing Ivermectin.
c. The pharmacist's refusal to dispense Ivermectin upon
the request of an individual, notwithstanding the existence of
a standing order for Ivermectin signed by a health care
provider which covers the pharmacist's employer or practice.
(f) This section shall not constitute standards of, nor
be construed as evidence for, the practice of medicine or the
practice of pharmacy. Nothing in this section shall alter,
amend, or supersede any provision of Section 6-5-333, Code of
100 Alabama 1975, or the Alabama Medical Liability Act of 1987,
101 commencing with Section 6-5-540, Code of Alabama 1975, or the
102 Alabama Medical Liability Act of 1996, commencing with Section
103 6-5-548, Code of Alabama 1975, or any amendment to any of the
104 foregoing, or any judicial interpretation of the foregoing.
105 (g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit
106 the Alabama Medicaid Agency, or any insurer, health
107 maintenance organization, health care service corporation, or
108 other third-party payor from determining the scope of its
109 benefits or services, setting terms for group or individual
110 insured, subscriber, or enrollee contracts, or negotiating
111 contracts with licensed providers on reimbursement rates or
112 other lawful provisions. However, the contract providing
Page 4

other lawful provisions. However, the contract providing
HB146 INTRODUCED
113 coverage to an insured cannot exclude the right to assign
114 benefits to any provider at the same benefit as paid to a
115 contract provider.
116 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
117 1, 2026.
Page 5